Illinois, session 104th, SB4004.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Data 5Center Water Transparency and Aquifer Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to ensure 7Illinoisans living on the Mahomet Aquifer have adequate access 8to water and to ensure transparency regarding the water usage 9of data centers operating in the State. 10    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:11    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 12Agency. 13    "Aquifer" means saturated (with groundwater) soils and 14geologic materials which are sufficiently permeable to readily 15yield economically useful quantities of water to wells, 16springs, or streams under ordinary hydraulic gradients. 17    "Data center" means a facility used to house computer 18systems and associated components, including 19telecommunications and storage systems, where the primary 20function is the storage, management, and dissemination of 21data.22    "Groundwater" means underground water which occurs within   SB4004- 2 -LRB104 20379 JDS 33836 b1the saturated zone and geologic materials where the fluid 2pressure in the pore space is equal to or greater than 3atmospheric pressure. 4    "Nondisclosure agreement" means any contract, agreement, 5clause, term, condition, or understanding that has the purpose 6or effect of restricting, prohibiting, delaying, or 7conditioning the disclosure of information, including 8confidentiality agreements, secrecy provisions, side letters, 9memoranda of understanding, or settlement agreements. 10    "Water consumption" means the total amount of water 11consumed by a data center, including water used for cooling, 12measured in gallons. 13    Section 15. Data center groundwater withdrawal 14prohibition. 15    (a) No data center operating within this State shall use 16water from the Mahomet Aquifer. 17    (b) No State agency shall issue or renew a permit 18authorizing a data center to withdraw groundwater from the 19Mahomet Aquifer. 20    Section 20. Existing data centers. A data center operating 21before the effective date of this Act shall: 22        (1) cease all groundwater withdrawals from the Mahomet 23    Aquifer no later than January 1, 2028; and24        (2) transition to alternative water sources,   SB4004- 3 -LRB104 20379 JDS 33836 b1    including, but not limited to, reclaimed water, surface 2    water, or closed-loop or air-cooled systems. 3    Section 25. Prohibition on nondisclosure agreements 4related to water use. 5    (a) A unit of local government may not enter into, 6enforce, or renew a nondisclosure agreement, confidentiality 7clause, or similar contractual provision with a data center 8that restricts the disclosure of information related to the 9data center's water use. 10    (b) Information related to water use includes, but is not 11limited to: 12        (1) the source or sources of water used by a data 13    center; 14        (2) the volume, rate, or timing of water withdrawals, 15    consumption, or discharge; 16        (3) groundwater or surface water impacts; 17        (4) water use permit applications, approvals, 18    compliance reports, monitoring data; and 19        (5) water conservation, reuse, or cooling practices. 20    (c) Failure to comply with the provisions of this Section 21renders any promise of confidentiality related to water usage 22against public policy, void, and severable from an otherwise 23valid and enforceable agreement. 24    Section 30. Data confidentiality and public access.   SB4004- 4 -LRB104 20379 JDS 33836 b1    (a) Proprietary information is exempt from disclosure to 2the extent provided under the Freedom of Information Act. 3Aggregated and anonymized data shall be made available to the 4public. 5    (b) The Agency shall publish an annual report summarizing 6statewide water consumption trends in data centers, including, 7but not limited to, legislative recommendations to address 8identified issues. 9    Section 35. Enforcement and penalties. Any person that 10violates Section 15 of this Act, paragraph (1) of Section 20 of 11this Act, any rule adopted by the Agency under this Act, any 12permit or term or condition of a permit issued pursuant to 13rules adopted under this Act, or any order of the Agency under 14this Act is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $50,000 15for the violation and an additional civil penalty not to 16exceed $10,000 for each day during which the violation 17continues. Civil penalties imposed under this Section may, 18upon order of the Agency or a court, be made payable to the 19Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be used in accordance 20with the provisions of the Environmental Protection Trust Fund 21Act. 22    Section 40. Rules. The Agency may adopt rules to implement 23and administer this Act.   SB4004- 5 -LRB104 20379 JDS 33836 b1    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 2severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.